Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,100
School of esthetics license; application; additional information.

In order to be licensed as a school of esthetics by the department, an applicant shall meet and present to the department evidence of meeting the following requirements:

(1) The proposed school shall be a fixed permanent structure or part of one;

(2) The proposed school shall have a contracted enrollment of at least four full-time or part-time students;

(3) The proposed school shall contain at least one thousand square feet of floor space and facilities, staff, apparatus, and equipment appropriate to its projected enrollment in accordance with the standards established by rule and regulation; and

(4) The proposed school shall not have the same entrance as or direct access to a cosmetology salon, an esthetics salon, or a nail technology salon.

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 34;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,138.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 362;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 28.